apertium-bre.bre.dix
    <pardef n="sili/enn__n">
      <e><p><l>enn</l><r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ennoù</l><r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>où</l><r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	
	

    <pardef n="/aerouant__n">
      <e><p><l>aerouant</l><r>aerouant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erevent</l><r>aerouant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aerouantez</l><r>aerouant<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aerouantezed</l><r>aerouant<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/azhig__n">
      <e><p><l>azhig</l><r>azhig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izhierigoù</l><r>azhig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="koadeg__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>où</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="golv/an__n">
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tort__n">
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>où</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="brizhenn__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>où</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chekenn/aoueg__n">
      <e><p><l>aoueg</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aouegi</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aouegoù</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gen/aoueg__n">
      <e><p><l>aoueg</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aouegez</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aoueien</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aoueien</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aoueged</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aouegezed</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aouegi</l><r>aoueg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="brage/z__n">
      <e><p><l>z</l><r>z<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ier</l><r>z<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zioù</l><r>z<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dam/ez__n">
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>ez<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izien</l><r>ez<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lardone/nn__n">
      <e><p><l>nn</l><r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nned</l><r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="br/ezhell__n">
      <e><p><l>ezhell</l><r>ezhell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izhilli</l><r>ezhell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Gall__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aoued</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="barilh/ig__n">
      <e><p><l>ig</l><r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oùigoù</l><r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/enveg__n">
      <e><p><l>enveg</l><r>enveg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>invioù</l><r>enveg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inviji</l><r>enveg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>envegoù</l><r>enveg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="krouer__n">
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ioù</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="senk__n">
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enn</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>où</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gour__n">
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ioù</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tommerez__n">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ioù</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kl/oc’h__n">
      <e><p><l>oc’h</l><r>oc’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ec’hier</l><r>oc’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eier</l><r>oc’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bug/el__n">
      <e><p><l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ale</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aled</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>alez</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>elien</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>elion</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bug/elig__n">
      <e><p><l>elig</l><r>elig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aligoù</l><r>elig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="br/eurig__n">
      <e><p><l>eurig</l><r>eurig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eudeurigoù</l><r>eurig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	
	
    <pardef n="bini/où__n">
      <e><p><l>où</l><r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awoù</l><r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aouioù</l><r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>

    <pardef n="bini/ou__n">
      <e><p><l>ou</l><r>ou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awoù</l><r>ou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aouioù</l><r>ou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>	  
	  
    <pardef n="kilh/og__n">
      <e><p><l>og</l><r>og<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eien</l><r>og<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bleiz__n">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezed</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="enselladur__n">
      <e><p><l>iou</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rev__n">
      <e><p><l>ejer</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="gwinieg"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>inieg</i><par n="koadeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koadeg"><par n="initial-k"/><i>oadeg</i><par n="koadeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pineg"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ineg</i><par n="koadeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bleiz"><par n="initial-b"/><i>leiz</i><par n="bleiz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morvleiz"><par n="initial-m"/><i>orvleiz</i><par n="bleiz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geriaoueg"><par n="initial-g"/><i>eri</i><par n="chekenn/aoueg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="levraoueg"><i>levr</i><par n="chekenn/aoueg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skeudennaoueg"><i>skeudenn</i><par n="chekenn/aoueg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="genaoueg"><par n="initial-g"/><i>en</i><par n="gen/aoueg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="silienn"><i>sili</i><par n="sili/enn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bugel"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ug</i><par n="bug/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gall"><par n="initial-G"/><i>all</i><par n="Gall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aerouant"><i></i><par n="/aerouant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="breurig"><par n="initial-b"/><i>r</i><par n="br/eurig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bugelig"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ug</i><par n="bug/elig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bizskriverez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>izskriverez</i><par n="tommerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skriverez"><i>skriverez</i><par n="tommerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tommerez"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ommerez</i><par n="tommerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kilhog"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ilh</i><par n="kilh/og__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enselladur"><i>enselladur</i><par n="enselladur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rev"><i>rev</i><par n="rev__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brezhell"><par n="initial-b"/><i>r</i><par n="br/ezhell__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barilhig"><par n="initial-b"/><i>arilh</i><par n="barilh/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kazhig"><par n="initial-k"/><i></i><par n="k/azhig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biniou" r="LR"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ini</i><par n="bini/ou__n"/></e>
    <e lm="damez"><par n="initial-d"/><i>am</i><par n="dam/ez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barrennig"><par n="initial-b"/><i>arrenn</i><par n="barilh/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kloc’h"><par n="initial-k"/><i>l</i><par n="kl/oc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bragez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rage</i><par n="brage/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="golvan"><par n="initial-g"/><i>olv</i><par n="golv/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lardonenn"><i>lardone</i><par n="lardone/nn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="engraver"><i>engraver</i><par n="krouer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="euzhadenn"><i>euzhadenn</i><par n="brizhenn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gour"><par n="initial-g"/><i>our</i><par n="gour__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krouadur"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rouadur</i><par n="krouer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krouer"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rouer</i><par n="krouer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krug"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rug</i><par n="brizhenn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ribod"><i>ribod</i><par n="tort__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kailh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ailh</i><par n="senk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senk"><i>senk</i><par n="senk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="speg"><i>speg</i><par n="tort__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stivell"><i>stivell</i><par n="brizhenn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tort"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ort</i><par n="tort__n"/></e>
    <e lm="benveg gwintañ" c="Use/MT"><par n="initial-b"/><i></i><par n="b/enveg__n"/><p><l><b/>gwintañ</l><r><g><b/>gwintañ</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="benveg labour" c="Use/MT"><par n="initial-b"/><i></i><par n="b/enveg__n"/><p><l><b/>labour</l><r><g><b/>labour</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="benveg seniñ" c="Use/MT"><par n="initial-b"/><i></i><par n="b/enveg__n"/><p><l><b/>seniñ</l><r><g><b/>seniñ</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="binioù bras" c="Use/MT"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ini</i><par n="bini/où__n"/><p><l><b/>bras</l><r><g><b/>bras</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="biniou bras" r="LR" c="Use/MT"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ini</i><par n="bini/ou__n"/><p><l><b/>bras</l><r><g><b/>bras</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="binioù kozh" c="Use/MT"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ini</i><par n="bini/où__n"/><p><l><b/>kozh</l><r><g><b/>kozh</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="biniou kozh" r="LR" c="Use/MT"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ini</i><par n="bini/ou__n"/><p><l><b/>kozh</l><r><g><b/>kozh</g></r></p></e>
